Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1 General Provisions
48-249-113. Procedure for service on domestic or foreign LLC by service on secretary of state.

Service on secretary of state. When the secretary of state is an agent for a domestic or foreign LLC, as provided in § 48-249-112(b), service on the secretary of state of any process, notice or demand shall be made by delivering the original and one (1) copy of such process, notice or demand to the office of the secretary of state, duly certified by the appropriate official, together with the proper fee. A statement that identifies which of the grounds, as listed in § 48-249-112(b), for service on the secretary of state is applicable shall be included. The office of the secretary of state shall endorse the time of receipt upon the original and copy, and shall immediately send the copy, along with a written notice that service of the original also was made, by registered or certified mail, with return receipt requested, addressed to the domestic or foreign LLC at its registered office or principal office (or designated alternative mailing address) as shown in the records on file in the secretary of state's office, or as shown in the official registry of the state or country in which the foreign LLC is formed. The secretary of state may require the person seeking to serve the process, notice or demand, or the person's attorney, if any, to furnish the latter address.

Refusal of service ineffective. The refusal or failure of the domestic or foreign LLC to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail provided for in subsection (a), or the refusal or failure to sign the return receipt, shall not affect the validity of the service. Any domestic or foreign LLC refusing or failing to accept delivery of such registered or certified mail shall be charged with knowledge of the contents of any process, notice or demand contained in the registered or certified mail.

Receipt received by secretary of state. When the registered or certified mail return receipt is received by the office of the secretary of state, or when a domestic or foreign LLC refuses or fails to accept delivery of the registered or certified mail, and it is returned to the office of the secretary of state, the office of the secretary of state shall forward the receipt or such refused or undelivered mail to the clerk of the court in which the proceeding is pending, or other appropriate official or person, together with the original process, notice or demand, a copy of the notice the secretary of state sent to the defendant LLC and the secretary of state's affidavit setting forth the secretary of state's compliance with this section. Service made under this section shall have the same legal force and validity as if the service had been made personally in this state.

Subsequent pleadings. Subsequent pleadings or papers permitted or required to be served on a domestic or foreign LLC may be served on the secretary of state as agent for the domestic or foreign LLC in the same manner, at the same cost and with the same effect, as process, notice or demand is served on the secretary of state as agent for the domestic or foreign LLC under this section.

Minimum time for appearance. No appearance shall be required in the proceeding by the domestic or foreign LLC on which service is completed under this section, nor shall any judgment be taken against such domestic LLC in less than one (1) month after the date service is completed under this section.

Record retained. The secretary of state shall keep a record of all processes, notices, demands and subsequent pleadings or papers served upon the secretary of state under this section, which record shall include the time of each service and the secretary of state's action with reference to the service.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2014, ch. 783, § 13.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

48-249-114. Personal liability.

Limited liability rule.

Except as provided in subsections (d) and (f):

The debts, obligations and liabilities of an LLC, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise, are solely the debts, obligations and liabilities of the LLC;

A member, holder, director, manager, officer, employee or other agent of an LLC does not have any personal obligation, and is not otherwise personally liable, for the acts, debts, liabilities or obligations of the LLC; and

A member, holder, director, manager, officer, employee or other agent of an LLC does not have any personal obligation, and is not otherwise personally liable, for the acts or omissions of any other member, holder, manager, officer, director, employee or other agent of the LLC.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (a)(1)(B) and (C), a member, holder of financial rights, director, manager, officer, employee or other agent may be personally liable by reason of such person's own acts or omissions.

Limited liability after dissolution. The limitation on liability described in subsection (a) continues in full force, regardless of any dissolution, winding up or termination of an LLC.

Member not a proper party to proceeding. A member, holder, director, manager, officer, employee or other agent of an LLC is not a proper party to a proceeding by or against an LLC, except:

Where the object of the proceeding is to enforce such person's right against, or liability to, the LLC;

In a derivative proceeding brought under this chapter or the LLC documents; or

Where the proceeding asserts personal liability of such person, as described in subsection (a).

Sales tax liability. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, each member, manager, director, officer, employee, agent or other person required to collect, truthfully account for and pay over to the department of revenue any tax collected from the customers of a domestic or foreign LLC shall be personally liable for those taxes, in the same manner as responsible persons of a corporation under § 67-1-1443.

Failure to follow formalities not to generate personal liability. The failure of a domestic or foreign LLC to observe the usual entity formalities or requirements relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its business is not a ground for imposing personal liability on the members, holders, managers, directors, officers, employees or other agents of the domestic or foreign LLC.

Voluntary unlimited liability.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the articles may provide that one (1) or more specifically identified members, as named in the articles, will be personally liable for all of the debts, obligations and liabilities of the LLC. If that provision is made, each such specifically identified member shall be liable to the same extent as a general partner in a general partnership; provided, that:

In order to be effective, each member so identified shall sign the articles or an amendment to the articles containing this provision; and

Each member identified in the articles shall continue to be personally liable for debts, obligations and liabilities of the LLC until the articles are amended to delete the member's name, but, except as provided in subdivision (f)(2), the amendment shall be signed by a person authorized to bind the LLC under § 48-249-402, and by any remaining members who continue to be identified in the articles as being personally liable for the debts, obligations and liabilities of the LLC.

A member who is identified in the articles as being personally liable has the power, but not necessarily the right, to file an amendment to the articles, stating that such member will not be liable for any future debts, obligations and liabilities of the LLC, except with respect to persons that have reasonably relied upon the articles.

An amendment to the articles filed under subdivisions (f)(1) and (2) shall be effective immediately, except that such an amendment is not effective against persons reasonably relying upon the articles naming the member as individually liable for the debts, obligations and liabilities of the LLC, until the passage of ninety (90) days from the filing of the amendment to the articles.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f)(3)(A), such member shall continue to be liable for all debts and obligations of the LLC incurred by the LLC during the time that the member was identified in the articles as being personally liable.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2020, ch. 604, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “this” following “Notwithstanding” in (f)(3)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 604, § 5. March 20, 2020.

48-249-115. Indemnification.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Expenses” means, without limitation, counsel fees;

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine, including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan, or reasonable expenses incurred with respect to a proceeding;

“LLC” includes any domestic LLC and any domestic or foreign predecessor of an LLC in a merger or other transaction in which the predecessor's existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction;

“Official capacity” means:

With respect to a director in a director-managed LLC, the position of director;

With respect to a manager in a manager-managed LLC, the position of manager;

With respect to a member in a member-managed LLC, a member who took an action of management as a member; and

With respect to a person in a capacity not described in subdivision (a)(4)(A)(i), (a)(4)(A)(ii) or (a)(4)(A)(iii), the elective or appointive office or position held by an officer, member of a committee of the board of directors or member of a committee of the managers or members or the employment or agency relationship undertaken by an employee or agent on behalf of the LLC; and

“Official capacity” does not mean service for any other foreign or domestic entity;

“Party” means an individual who was, is or is threatened to be made a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding;

“Responsible person” means an individual who is or was a director of a director-managed LLC, a manager of a manager-managed LLC or a member of a member-managed LLC, or an individual who, while a director of a director-managed LLC, a manager of a manager-managed LLC, or a member of a member-managed LLC, is or was serving at the LLC's request as a director, manager, officer, partner, trustee, employee or agent of an employee benefit plan or any other foreign or domestic entity. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(6), a director of a director-managed LLC, a manager of a manager-managed LLC or a member of a member-managed LLC is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the LLC's request, if the director's, manager's or member's duties to the LLC also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, the director, manager or member to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. “Responsible person” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a responsible person; and

“Special legal counsel” means counsel who has not represented the LLC or a related LLC, or a member, director, manager, member of a committee of the board of directors, member of a committee of the managers, member of a committee of the members, officer, agent or employee, whose indemnification is in issue.

Authority to indemnify.

Except as provided in subsection (d), an LLC may indemnify an individual made a party to a proceeding, because such individual is or was a responsible person against liability incurred in the proceeding, if the individual:

Acted in good faith;

Reasonably believed:

In the case of conduct in such individual's official capacity with the LLC, that such individual's conduct was in the LLC's best interest; and

In all other cases, that such individual's conduct was at least not opposed to the LLC's best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe such individual's conduct was unlawful.

A responsible person's conduct, with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose such person reasonably believed to be in the best interests of the participants in and beneficiaries of the plan, is conduct that satisfies the requirement of subdivision (b)(1)(B).

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement or conviction or upon a plea of nolo contendere, or its equivalent, is not, of itself, determinative that the responsible person did not meet the standard of conduct described in this section.

Except as provided in subsection (e), an LLC may not indemnify a responsible person under this section:

In connection with a proceeding by, or in the right of, the LLC in which the responsible person was adjudged liable to the LLC; or

In connection with any other proceeding charging improper personal benefit to such responsible person, whether or not involving action in such person's official capacity, in which such person was adjudged liable on the basis that personal benefit was improperly received by such person.

Mandatory indemnification. An LLC shall indemnify a responsible person who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which the person was a party, because the person is or was a responsible person, against reasonable expenses incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding.

Advances for expenses.

An LLC may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by a responsible person who is a party to a proceeding, in advance of final disposition of the proceeding, if:

The responsible person furnishes the LLC a written affirmation of good faith belief that such responsible person has met the standard of conduct described in subsection (b);

The responsible person furnishes the LLC a written undertaking, executed personally or on such responsible person's behalf, to repay the advance, if it is ultimately determined that the responsible person is not entitled to indemnification; and

A determination is made that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this section.

The undertaking required by subdivision (d)(1)(B) shall be an unlimited general obligation of the responsible person, but need not be secured, and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment.

Determinations and authorizations of payments under this section shall be made in the manner specified in subsection (f).

Court ordered indemnification. A responsible person who is a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification to the court conducting the proceeding, or to another court of competent jurisdiction. On receipt of an application, the court, after giving any notice the court considers necessary, may order indemnification, if it determines:

The responsible person is entitled to mandatory indemnification under subsection (c), in which case the court shall also order the LLC to pay the responsible person's reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court ordered indemnification; or

The responsible person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether or not the responsible person met the standard of conduct set forth in subdivision (b)(1), or was adjudged liable as described in subdivision (b)(4). If the responsible person was adjudged so liable, the responsible person's indemnification is limited to reasonable expenses incurred.

Determination and authorization of indemnification.

Except as provided in subsection (e), an LLC may not indemnify a responsible person under subsection (b), unless authorized in the specific case, after a determination has been made that indemnification of the responsible person is permissible in the circumstances, because the responsible person has met the standard of conduct set forth in subdivision (b)(1).

Such determination shall be made:

By the board of directors of a director-managed LLC, by the managers of a manager-managed LLC, or by the members of a member-managed LLC, as applicable, by majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors, managers or members, as applicable, not at the time parties to the proceeding;

If a quorum cannot be obtained under subdivision (f)(2)(A), by majority vote of a committee duly designated by the board of directors of a board-managed LLC, by the managers of a manager-managed LLC, or by the members of a member-managed LLC, as applicable, in which designation directors, managers or members, as applicable, who are parties may participate, consisting solely of two (2) or more directors, managers or members, as applicable, who are not at the time parties to the proceeding;

By special legal counsel:

Selected by the board of directors of a director-managed LLC, by the managers of a manager-managed LLC, or by the members of a member-managed LLC, as applicable, or by a committee in the manner prescribed in subdivision (f)(2)(A) or (f)(2)(B); or

If a quorum of the board of directors of a director-managed LLC, the managers of a manager-managed LLC, or the members of a member-managed LLC, as applicable, cannot be obtained under subdivision (f)(2)(A) and a committee cannot be designated under subdivision (f)(2)(B), selected by majority vote of the full board of directors of a director-managed LLC, by the managers of a manager-managed LLC, or by the members of a member-managed LLC, in which selection directors, managers or members, as applicable, who are parties to the proceeding may participate; or

By a majority vote of the members of a director-managed LLC or a manager-managed LLC, but voting rights owned or controlled by members who are at the time parties to the proceeding may not be voted on the determination.

Authorization of indemnification, and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses, shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that, if the determination is made by special legal counsel, authorization of indemnification and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made by those entitled under subdivision (f)(2)(C) to select counsel.

Indemnification of officers, employees and agents.

An officer of the LLC who is not a responsible person is entitled to mandatory indemnification under subsection (c), and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification under subsection (e), in each case, to the same extent as a responsible person.

The LLC may indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, independent contractor or agent of the LLC who is not a responsible person, to the same extent as a responsible person.

An LLC may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, independent contractor or agent who is not a responsible person, to the extent, consistent with public policy, that may be provided by its LLC documents, by general or specific action of the board of directors of a director-managed LLC, by the managers of a manager-managed LLC, by the members of a member-managed LLC, or by contract.

Insurance. An LLC may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a person who is or was a responsible person, officer, employee, independent contractor or agent of the LLC, or who, while a responsible person, officer, employee, independent contractor or agent of the LLC, is or was serving at the request of the LLC as a responsible person, officer, partner, trustee, employee, independent contractor or agent of an employee benefit plan or any other domestic or foreign entity, against liability asserted against or incurred by such person acting in that capacity, or arising from the person's status as a responsible person, officer, employee, independent contractor or agent, whether or not the LLC would have power to indemnify the person against the same liability under subsection (b), (c) or (g).

Nonexclusivity.

The indemnification and advancement of expenses, granted under or provided by this section, shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which a responsible person seeking indemnification or advancement of expenses may be entitled, whether contained in this section, the LLC documents, or, when authorized by such LLC documents, action of the members, directors or managers or an agreement providing for such indemnification; provided, that no indemnification may be made to or on behalf of any responsible person, if a judgment, or other final adjudication adverse to the responsible person or officer, establishes such person's liability:

For any breach of the duty of loyalty to the LLC or its members;

For acts or omissions not in good faith, or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; or

Under § 48-249-307.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect any rights to indemnification to which the LLC's personnel, other than responsible persons, may be entitled by contract or otherwise under law. If the LLC documents limit indemnification or advances for expenses, indemnification and advances for expenses are valid only to the extent consistent with the LLC documents.

This section does not limit an LLC's power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a responsible person, officer, employee, independent contractor or agent, in connection with such person's appearance as a witness in a proceeding, at a time when such person has not been made a named defendant or respondent to the proceeding.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-116. LLC as legal entity.

An LLC is a legal entity distinct from its members.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.